Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-904, as
amended by Section 65, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 11-904), is amended to read as follows:
Section 11-904. A. Any person who is involved in a personal
injury accident while driving or operating a motor vehicle within
this state and who is in violation of the provisions of subsection A
of Section 11-902 of this title may be charged with a violation of
the provisions of this subsection as follows:
1. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the provisions
of this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor for the
first offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county
jail for not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one (1) year,
and a fine of not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00); and
2. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the provisions
of this subsection after having been previously convicted of a
violation of this subsection or of Section 11-902 of this title
shall be deemed guilty of a Class B5 felony offense and shall be

punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not less than one (1) year and not more than five
(5) years, and a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00).
B. 1. Any person who causes an accident resulting in great
bodily injury to any person other than himself or herself while
driving or operating a motor vehicle within this state and who is in
violation of the provisions of subsection A of Section 11-902 of
this title may be charged with a violation of the provisions of this
subsection. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the
provisions of this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a Class B1
felony offense punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for not less than four (4) years and not
more than twenty (20) years, and a fine of not more than Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).
2. C. As used in this subsection section, "great bodily injury"
means bodily injury which creates a serious compound bone fracture,
protracted and obvious disfigurement, protracted loss or impairment
of the function of a body part, organ or mental faculty, or
substantial risk of death or which causes serious, permanent
disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of
any bodily member or organ.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3695 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3695 Page 3